Utah statutes.
16-7-16.   Prohibition on formation of corporation sole after May 3, 2004.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a corporation sole may not be formed or incorporated under this chapter after May 3, 2004.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 2004 General Session

